ru: Назначение нитевдевателя: Бисероплетение; Вышивка; Общего назначения/универсальный; Ручное шитье; Вязание (иглы для пряжи); Квилтинг; Гобелен/вышивка по канве; Другое
en: Threader intended use: Beading; Embroidery; General/multi-purpose; Hand sewing; Knitting (yarn needles); Quilting; Tapestry/needlepoint; Other
fr: Utilisation prévue du passe-fil: Perlage; Broderie; Général/multifonction; Couture à la main; Tricot (aiguilles à laine); Matelassage; Tapisserie/point d'aiguille; Autre
ja: スレッダー使用目的: ビーズ細工; 刺繍; 一般用/多目的; 手縫い; 編み物 (とじ針); キルティング; タペストリー/ニードルポイント; その他
cs: Zamýšlené použití navlékače: Korálkování; Vyšívání; Obecné/víceúčelové; Ruční šití; Pletení (jehly na přízi); Prošívání; Tapisérie / vyšívání gobelínů; Ostatní
ro-RO: Utilizare intenționată a dispozitivului de introdus ața în ac: Înșirat mărgele; Broderie; Uz general/multifuncțional; Cusut manual; Tricotat (ace pentru fire groase); Quilting; Tapiserie/broderie de mână; Altele
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση βελόνας: Πέρασμα χαντρών; Κέντημα; Γενικής/πολλαπλής χρήσης; Ράψιμο στο χέρι; Πλέξιμο (βελόνες νήματος); Καπιτονέ; Ταπισερί/κέντημα σε καμβά; Άλλο
zh-TW: 穿線器預期用途: 串珠; 刺繡; 一般/多用途; 手縫; 針織 (毛線針); 絎縫; 掛毯/針繡; 其他
tr: Dişli kullanım amacı: Boncuk dizme; Nakış; Genel/çok amaçlı; El dikişi; Örgü (yün iğneleri); Kapitone; Goblen/kanaviçe; Diğer
nl: Beoogd gebruik draadinrijger: Kralen rijgen; Borduren; Algemeen/multifunctioneel; Met de hand naaien; Breien (garennaalden); Quilten; Tapijt/borduren; Overige
lt-LT: Įvėriklio numatytoji paskirtis: Vėrimas; Siuvinėjimas; Bendrojo / universalaus naudojimo; Siuvimas rankomis; Mezgimas (verpalų adatos); Daigstymas; Gobenai / siuvinėjimas kryželiu; Kita
pt-PT: Finalidade do enfiador: Missangas; Bordado; Geral/multiusos; Costura à mão; Tricô (agulhas de lã); Acolchoamento; Tapeçaria/ponto de agulha; Outro
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานของอุปกรณ์ร้อยด้วย: งานร้อยลูกปัด; งานปัก; งานทั่วไป/อเนกประสงค์; งานเย็บมือ; นิตติ้ง (เข็มไหมพรม); งานควิลต์; ทาเพสทรี/งานปักครอสสติตช์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Určené použitie rezača závitov: Korálkovanie; Vyšívanie; Všeobecné/viacúčelové; Ručné šitie; Pletenie (ihlice na priadzu); Prešívanie (Quilting); Gobelín/vyšívanie; Iné
sv: Avsedd användning för trädare: Pärlträdning; Broderi; Allmänt/mångsidigt; Handsömnad; Stickning (garnnålar); Quiltning; Gobeläng/canvasbroderi; Annat
es: Uso previsto del enhebrador: Abalorios; Bordado; Uso general/multiuso; Costura a mano; Tejido (agujas de lana); Acolchado; Tapicería/punto de aguja; Otro
vi: Mục đích sử dụng dự kiến của dụng cụ xỏ chỉ: Xỏ hạt; Thêu; Tổng hợp/đa năng; May tay; Đan len (kim len); Chần bông; Thêu thảm/thêu kim; Khác
de: Verwendungszweck des Einfädlers: Perlenauffädeln; Sticken; Allgemein/Mehrzweck; Handnähen; Stricken (Garnnadeln); Quilten; Tapisserie/Gobelinstickerei; Sonstige
fi: Langoittimen käyttötarkoitus: Helmityöt; Kirjonta; Yleinen/monikäyttöinen; Käsinompelu; Neulonta (lankaneulat); Tilkkutyö; Kanavatyö/gobeliini; Muu
it: Uso previsto dell'infilafilo: Infilatura perline; Ricamo; Uso generale/multiuso; Cucito a mano; Maglia (aghi da lana); Quilting; Arazzo/mezzo punto; Altro
bg-BG: Предназначение на уред за вдяване на конец: За мъниста; За бродерия; Общо/многофункционално; За ръчно шиене; Плетене (игли за прежда); За куилтинг; Гоблени/кръстат бод; Друго
hu: Befűző rendeltetése: Gyöngyfűzés; Hímzés; Általános/többcélú; Kézi varrás; Kötés (fonalvarró tűk); Foltvarrás; Gobelin/hímzés; Egyéb
da: Tilsigtet brug af tråder: Perlesyning; Broderi; Generelt håndværk; Håndsyning; Strikning (garnnåle); Quiltning; Billedvævning/stramaj; Andet
pt-BR: Uso pretendido do aplicador de cabos: Miçangas; Bordado; Uso geral/multiuso; Costura à mão; Tricô (agulhas de fio); Quilting; Tapeçaria/ponto de agulha; Outros
zh-CN: 穿针器预期用途: 串珠; 刺绣; 通用/多用途; 手工缝纫; 针织（纱线针）; 绗缝; 挂毯/刺绣; 其他
ko: 실 끼우개 권장 용도: 비즈 공예; 자수; 일반/다목적; 손바느질; 뜨개질(털실 바늘); 퀼팅; 태피스트리/니들포인트; 기타
nb: Tiltenkt bruk for nåleitreder: Perling; Broderi; Generell/flerbruk; Håndsøm; Strikking (garnnåler); Quilting; Billedvev/nålearbeid; Annet
pl: Przeznaczenie nawlekacza: Nawlekanie koralików; Haftowanie; Ogólnego przeznaczenia/wielofunkcyjne; Szycie ręczne; Dzierganie (igły do włóczki); Pikowanie; Gobeliny/haft igłowy; Inne
sl-SI: Predviden namen uporabe vdevalca niti: Nizanje perlic; Vezenje; Splošno/večnamensko; Ročno šivanje; Pletenje (igle za prejo); Prešivanje; Tapiserija/vezenje s križci; Drugo
hr-HR: Namjena alata za provlačenje niti: Nizanje perli; Vezenje; Opća/višestruka namjena; Ručno šivanje; Pletenje (igle za pređu); Prošivanje (quilting); Tapiserija / vezenje na platnu; Ostalo